Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB816.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1426. Parent Educational Information Regarding Eating Disorders.--(a) Each school entity shall annually provide parent educational information regarding eating disorders for pupils in grades six through twelve. The information shall be consistent with guidelines established under this section.(b) Each school entity shall provide the annual parent educational information to all parents and guardians via email, 1234567891011121314151617181920 first class mail or on the school entity's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) The following shall apply:(1) The Department of Education, in conjunction with the Department of Health, shall develop an Eating Disorders Task Force that shall develop and implement guidelines for providing parent educational information regarding eating disorders. The guidelines shall be developed with input from specialized organizations and entities, including boards of school directors, school superintendents, the National Alliance for Eating Disorders, the Pennsylvania Association of School Nurses and Practitioners, the Pennsylvania Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the Pennsylvania Academy of Family Physicians, the International Association of Eating Disorders Professionals Foundation and the Academy for Eating Disorders.(2) The Eating Disorders Task Force shall meet at least two times per school year to reassess the information provided to schools and to parents. The task force shall meet at least once prior to the school year beginning and shall meet at least once in the beginning of the calendar year.(d) The Department of Education, the Department of Health and the Eating Disorders Task Force shall identify and develop appropriate additions or revisions to this Commonwealth's school health regulations and materials related to the development of parent educational information, including guidance regarding the clear delineation of health information from other administrative documentation.(e) The guidelines developed under this section shall include the following:(1) The development of a letter for key school personnel, 20250SB0816PN0878 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including school principals, vice principals and school counselors and psychologists, on the importance of eating disorder prevention education and resources for schools.(2) The development of a letter to parents and guardians that includes warning signs, risk factors, resources and other information about eating disorders.(f) As used in this section, the term "school entity" means an area career and technical school, a charter school, a cyber charter school, an intermediate unit, a nonpublic school or a school district.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0816PN0878 - 3 - 1234567891011